Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.56.330

Possession of another's identification.

(1) A person is guilty of possession of another's identification if the person knowingly possesses personal identification bearing another person's identity, when the person possessing the personal identification does not have the other person's permission to possess it, and when the possession does not amount to a violation of RCW 9.35.020.

(2) This section does not apply to:

(a) A person who obtains, by means other than theft, another person's personal identification for the sole purpose of misrepresenting his or her age;

(b) A person engaged in a lawful business who obtains another person's personal identification in the ordinary course of business;

(c) A person who finds another person's lost personal identification, does not intend to deprive the other person of the personal identification or to use it to commit a crime, and takes reasonably prompt steps to return it to its owner; and

(d) A law enforcement agency that produces or displays counterfeit credit or debit cards, checks or other payment instruments, or personal identification for investigative or educational purposes.

(3) In a proceeding under this section that is related to an identity theft under RCW 9.35.020, the crime will be considered to have been committed in any locality where the person whose means of identification or financial information was appropriated resides, or in which any part of the offense took place, regardless of whether the defendant was ever actually in that locality.

(4) A violation of this section is a gross misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 119 s 2.]